Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1759
Record of board and committee membership.

The credit union shall file within thirty calendar days after the credit union's annual meeting, a record of the names and addresses of (1) the members of its board of directors, (2) the members of its supervisory and credit committees, and (3) its officers, as required by the department. Such filing shall be made on forms approved and provided by the department.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 59.